Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB1778.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Short title.This act shall be known and may be cited as the Essential Energy Stability Fund Pilot Program Act.Section 2. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this act shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"CAP." A customer assistance program that is sponsored by a public utility for the purpose of providing universal service and energy conservation, as defined by section 2202 (relating to definitions) or 2803 (relating to definitions), in which customers make monthly payments based on household income and household size and under which customers must comply with 123456789101112131415161718 certain responsibilities and restrictions in order to remain eligible for the program."Department." The Department of Human Services of the Commonwealth."Eligible household." A household enrolled in LIHEAP, CAP or similar public utility assistance programs during the preceding heating season."LIHEAP." Low-Income Home Energy Assistance Program."Off-season." May 1 through September 30 each calendar year."Pilot program." The Essential Energy Stability Fund Pilot Program established under section 3.Section 3. Establishment of pilot program.(a) Duty of department.--The department shall establish and administer the Essential Energy Stability Fund Pilot Program to provide financial assistance to eligible households for electric and cooling-related utility costs during the off-season.(b) Form of assistance.--Assistance from the pilot program shall be provided in the form of direct bill credits applied in coordination with regulated utility providers.(c) Pilot program prioritization.--The pilot program shall prioritize households located in zip codes identified by the department as having higher heat vulnerability or energy burden.Section 4. Funding of the pilot program.The pilot program shall have the following funding:(1) The sum of $10,000,000 is appropriated from the General Fund to the department for the initial two-year operation of the pilot program.(2) The department may utilize any available carryover Federal LIHEAP money consistent with Federal rules to supplement the pilot program.20250HB1778PN2187 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Section 5. Coordination with utilities.The department shall enter into a memoranda of understanding with regulated electric and gas utilities for the:(1) Identification and verification of eligible households.(2) Application of assistance as bill credits during the off-season.(3) Reporting of disbursements and outcomes to the department.Section 6. Reporting.The department shall submit an annual report to the Governor and the General Assembly by February 1 of each year summarizing:(1) The number of households assisted by the pilot program.(2) The total money expended by the Commonwealth.(3) Geographic and demographic data on recipients under the pilot program.(4) Recommendations regarding continuation or expansion of the pilot program.Section 7. Expiration.The pilot program shall expire December 31, 2027.Section 8. Effective date.This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB1778PN2187 - 3 - 1234567891011121314151617181920212223